District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.07

Resignation of directors.

(a)

A director may resign at any time by delivering a signed notice in the form of a record to the chair of the board of directors or to an executive officer or the secretary of the corporation.

(b)

A resignation shall be effective when the notice is delivered unless the notice specifies a later effective time.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-401.50 and § 29-406.10.